Utah statutes.
17-52-302.   Convening of first meeting of study committee.

The county executive shall convene the first meeting of the study committee within 10 days after receipt of notification of the study committee members' appointment under Subsection 17-52-301(3)(a).



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

